Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) January 15 to April 4 of each year is designated as Black History Season
throughout the Commonwealth.
(2) The Governor shall proclaim January 15 to April 4 of each year as Black History
Season and shall encourage Kentuckians to:
(a) Acknowledge that all people of this Commonwealth and the United States
are the recipients of the wealth of history provided by Black culture;
(b) Recognize the importance of Black History Season as an opportunity to
reflect on the complex history while remaining hopeful and confident about
the path ahead;
(c) Acknowledge the significance of Black History Season as an important
opportunity to commemorate the tremendous contributions of African
Americans to the history of the United States and this great Commonwealth;
(d) Encourage the celebration of Black History Season to provide a continuing
opportunity for all people to learn from the past and understand the
experiences that have shaped the United States and this great
Commonwealth; and
(e) Move forward with purpose, united tirelessly as a nation "indivisible, with
liberty and justice for all."
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/19/2024 12:34 PM Jacketed